Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6417.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 5. As used in this act: (a) "Office" means the community and worker economic transition office created in section 7. (b) "Office director" means the director of the office. (c) "Transition activities" means those activities in which transition workers may participate to avoid suffering economic harm. Transition activities includes, but is not limited to, all of the following activities: (i) Educating transition workers regarding various programs available to them. (ii) Replacing lost income, gaps in income, and benefits for transition workers. (iii) Services for transition workers, such as education, training, career counseling, skills-matching, maintaining employment with current employer or reemployment services, and financial planning assistance. (iv) Replacing lost tax base revenue for transition communities. (v) Promoting the hiring of transition workers and the creation of jobs in transition communities that provide comparable or higher wages and benefits to jobs in transition-impacted industries. (d) "Transition community" means a municipality, county, or region that has been affected since September 23, 2020 or that demonstrates it will be impacted between the effective date of this act February 13, 2024 and January 1, 2040, by the loss of 50 or more jobs in a transition-impacted industry. (e) "Transition-impacted industry" means an industry that is impacted by transition, including all of the following: (i) Fossil fuel energy workers who have employment tied to the generation, transportation, and refinement of fossil fuel. (ii) Internal combustion engine vehicle workers and workers in the supply chain for internal combustion engine vehicles. (iii) Workers in the building and construction trades. (iv) Workers who have employment tied to an industry affected by the adoption or implementation of artificial intelligence. (v) (iv) Any other affected workers. (f) "Transition plan" means the community and worker economic transition plan developed under section 7(3)(f) as described in section 9. (g) "Transition worker" means a worker in this state who has been laid off from employment in a transition-impacted industry since September 23, 2020 or who is or will be laid off from employment in a transition-impacted industry on or after the effective date of this act February 13, 2024 and before January 1, 2040.